ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 가정용 청소물품 > 스펀지/수세미: 수세미; 스펀지; 철 수세미
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > อุปกรณ์ทำความสะอาดในบ้าน > ฟองน้ำและแผ่นขัด: แผ่นขัดถู; ฟองน้ำ; ฝอยเหล็ก
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Productos de limpieza para el hogar > Esponjas y estropajos: Estropajos; Esponjas; Estropajo de acero
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Rengöringsutrustning för hushåll > Tvättsvampar och skurdynor: Skursvampar; Svampar; Stålull
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Schoonmaakmiddelen voor het huishouden > Sponzen en schuursponzen: Schuursponsjes; Sponzen; Staalwol
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Artykuły domowe do sprzątania > Gąbki i zmywaki do szorowania: Pady szorujące; Gąbki; Wełna stalowa
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Produse de curățare pentru casă > Bureți și tampoane de curățat: Bureți abrazivi; Bureți; Burete de sârmă
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Čisticí potřeby pro domácnost > Houby a drátěnky: Abrazivní houbičky; Houby; Ocelová vlna
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Siivoustarvikkeet > Sienet ja hankaussienet: Hankauslaput; Sienet; Teräsvilla
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Dụng cụ lau dọn gia dụng > Bọt biển & Miếng cọ rửa: Miếng cọ rửa; Miếng Bọt Biển; Len Thép Chà Rửa
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Buitiniai valymo reikmenys > Kempinės ir šveitimo pagalvėlės: Šveitimo pagalvėlės; Kempinės; Plieno vata
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Reinigungsutensilien > Schwämme & Topfreiniger: Scheuerschwämme; Schwämme; Stahlwolle
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Articoli pulizia casa > Spugne e spugne abrasive: Pagliette abrasive; Spugne; Lana d'acciaio
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Rengjøringsmidler for husbruk > Svamper og slipeputer: Skureputer; Svamper; Stålull
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Artigos de limpeza para o lar > Esponjas e esfregões: Esfregões; Esponjas; Lã de aço
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Домакински почистващи консумативи > Гъби и подложки за почистване: Гъби за почистване; Гъби; Стоманена вълна
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Nettoyage maison > Éponges et grattoirs: Tampons à récurer; Éponges; Paille de fer
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Čistiace prostriedky pre domácnosť > Špongie a drôtenky: Drôtenky; Špongie; Drôtenka
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Είδη καθαρισμού οικίας > Σφουγγάρια & σύρματα καθαρισμού: Σφουγγάρια καθαρισμού; Σφουγγάρια; Σύρμα καθαρισμού (ατσαλόμαλλο)
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > 掃除用品 > スポンジ・たわし: 研磨パッド; スポンジ; スチールウール
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Háztartási tisztítókellékek > Szivacsok és súrolópárnák: Súrolópárnák; Szivacsok; Acélgyapot
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Gospodinjska čistila > Gobice in blazinice za drgnjenje: Gobice za drgnjenje; Gobice; Jeklena volna
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Materiais para limpeza doméstica > Esponjas e esfregões de polir: Esponjas abrasivas; Esponjas; Palha de aço
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Household Cleaning Supplies > Sponges & Scouring Pads: Scouring Pads; Sponges; Steel Wool
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Rengøringsmidler > Svampe og grydesvampe: Skuresvampe; Svampe; Ståluld
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Oprema za čišćenje kućanstva > Spužve i jastučići za ribanje: Jastučići za ribanje; Spužvice; Čelična vuna
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Ev Temizlik Malzemeleri > Süngerler ve Ovma Bezleri: Ovma Pedleri; Süngerler; Çelik Yünü
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 家居清洁用品 > 海绵清洁球与百洁布: 百洁布; 海绵; 钢丝球
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 居家清潔用品 > 海綿和菜瓜布: 菜瓜布; 海綿; 鋼絲絨
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Бытовые чистящие средства и инвентарь для уборки > Губки: Губки для мытья посуды; Спонжи; Стальная вата